District of Columbia statutes.
44-1207

Fees and fines; rules.

(a)

The Mayor, by rule, shall establish a graduated, need-based, schedule of fees to charge individuals who receive treatment at the treatment facility established pursuant to § 44-1203. The Mayor, by rule, shall establish a schedule of fees for the certification required by § 44-1204.

(b)

The director of the treatment facility may file claims for payment for services provided to an individual who is a beneficiary of a policy or contract of health insurance that provides coverage for drug treatment services.

(c)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue any other rules necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(d)

Except as provided in § 44-1204(f), civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this chapter, or the rules issued under authority of this chapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infractions shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

Mar. 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-80, § 8, 36 DCR 8469
June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307, § 602, 49 DCR 11664
This section is referenced in § 44-1205.
1981 Ed., § 32-1607.
D.C. Law 14-307 inserted “and fines” after “fees” in the section heading; added the last sentence to subsec. (a); and added subsec. (d).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 602 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-544, December 4, 2002, 49 DCR 11700).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 602 of the Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-27, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2151).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 602 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-103, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5499).